West Virginia, session 2025, HB2950.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. AUTHENTICATION AND RECORD OF WRITINGS. §39-1-5. Acknowledgment by husband and wife. (a) When a husband and wife have signed a writing purporting to sell or convey real estate, the wife may acknowledge the same together with, or separately from her husband. Either the husband or the wife may sign and acknowledge the writing before the other has signed or acknowledged it. If both acknowledge the writing at the same time, the certificate of the acknowledgments may be in form or effect as follows:State (territory or district) of .......... county of ...................., to wit:I, .................., a notary public of the said county of ...................; or I, .........., clerk of the ......... court or county of ........; (or other officer or person authorized to take acknowledgments by section three of this article, as the case may be),* do certify .......... and .........., his or her wife whose names are signed to the writing above (or hereto annexed) bearing date the ..... day of .........., 20....., have this day acknowledged the same before me in my said ...........Given under my hand this ......... day of ........., 20.......(b) If the husband or wife acknowledge a deed or other writing separately from the other, the certificate of acknowledgment after the star in the foregoing form shall be in form or effect as follows: do certify that .........., the wife of .........., (or the husband of .........., as the case may be), whose name is signed to the writing above (or hereto annexed) bearing date the .......... day of .........., 20 ....., has this day acknowledged the same before me in my said ..........Given under my hand this .......... day of .........., 20 .....(c)   A deed or writing, that purports to sell or convey real estate for $12,000 or less, may be acknowledged by either a husband or wife without the necessity of acknowledgement of the  other.